North Carolina, session 2025, SB1032.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 7A-52(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Judges of the district court and judges of the superior court who have not reached the
mandatory retirement age specified in G.S. 7A-40.1 and G.S. 7A-140.1, respectively, but who
have retired under the provisions of G.S. 7A-51, or under the Uniform Judicial Retirement Act
after having completed five years of creditable service, may apply as provided in G.S. 7A-53 to
become emergency judges of the court from which they retired. From the commissioned
emergency district, superior, and special superior court judges, the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court shall create two lists of active emergency judges and two lists of inactive emergency
judges. For emergency superior and special superior court judges, the active list shall be limited
to a combined total of 10 emergency judges; all other emergency superior and special superior
court judges shall be on an inactive list. For emergency district court judges, the active list shall
be limited to 25 emergency judges; all other emergency district court judges shall be on an
inactive list. There is no limit to the number of emergency judges on either inactive list. In the
Chief Justice's discretion, emergency judges may be added or removed from their respective
active and inactive lists, as long as the respective numerical limits on the active lists are observed.
The Chief Justice is requested to consider geographical distribution in assigning emergency
judges to an active list but may utilize any factor in determining which emergency judges are
assigned to an active list. The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may order any emergency
district, superior, or special superior court judge on an active list who, in the Chief Justice's
opinion, is competent to perform the duties of a judge and to hold regular or special sessions of
the court from which the judge retired, as needed. Order of assignment shall be in writing and
entered upon the minutes of the court to which the emergency judge is assigned. An emergency
judge shall only be assigned in the event of a:
…
(7) Court coverage need (i) created by holdover sessions, administrative
responsibilities of the chief district court judge, or cases in which a judge has
a conflict or judicial educational responsibilities.responsibilities or (ii) as
determined by the chief district court judge."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to pay for costs of emergency judges.
*S1032-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of
this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1032-First Edition